District of Columbia statutes.
29A-805

Repealed

Power to lease, mortgage, and sell corporate property.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1284, ch. 854, § 603
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(7), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-805.
1981 Ed., § 29-1005.
1973 Ed., § 29-605.